Massachusetts, session 194th, H4157.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 30B of the General Laws or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, the City of Cambridge (“Cambridge”) may, for the procurement of a 
supply or service in the amount of $20,000 or less, use sound business practices (as defined in 
M.G.L. c. 30B, § 2) so long as the business awarded the contract is a disadvantaged businesses, 
diverse businesses, or small and local business enterprises, as certified by the supplier diversity 
office, by the City of Boston (“Boston”), by Cambridge by virtue of its compact (which may be 
amended from time to time) with Boston, or by virtue of certification by Cambridge, customarily 
providing the supply or service. Cambridge shall meet the requirements of section 3 of chapter 
30B, for those instances where contracts result from a purchase of $10,000 or more. 
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding chapter 30B of the General Laws or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, the procurement officer of Cambridge may, for the procurement of a 
supply or service in· the amount of $20,000 or greater, but not more than the small procurement 

of 2 13 threshold as defined by the Commonwealth of Massachusetts Operational Services Division, 
seek written quotations through a procurement officer from not fewer than three (3) 
disadvantaged businesses, diverse businesses or small and local business enterprises, as certified 
by the supplier diversity office, by Boston, by Cambridge by virtue of its compact (which may be 
amended from time to time) with Boston, or by virtue of certification by Cambridge, customarily 
providing the supply or service. The procurement officer shall record: (i) the names and 
addresses of all persons from whom quotations were sought; (ii) the specifications used for the 
procurement; (iii) the names of the persons submitting quotations; and 
(iv) the date and amount of each quotation. The recorded information shall be retained in 
the file required pursuant to section 3 of said chapter 30B. The procurement officer shall award 
the contract to the eligible and responsible bidder offering the needed quality of supply or service 
at the lowest quotation. After awarding a contract under this section, Cambridge shall publish 
notice of such award on Cambridge's website or other appropriate notification platform. 
SECTION 3. The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion 
thereof, should be held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent 
jurisdiction, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions, 
which remain in full force and effect. 
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.